Florida, session 2026, HB197.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
448.095, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
448.095 Employment eligibility.—
(2) EMPLOYMENT VERIFICATION.—
(b)1. A public agency shall use the E-Verify system to
verify a new employee's employment eligibility as required under
paragraph (a).
2. Beginning on July 1, 2026 2023, a private employer with
25 or more employees shall use the E-Verify system to verify a
new employee's employment eligibility as required under
paragraph (a).
3. Each employer required to use the E-Verify system under
this paragraph must certify on its first return each calendar
year to the tax service provider that it is in compliance with
this section when making contributions to or reimbursing the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb197-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 197 2026
state's unemployment compensation or reemployment assistance
system. An employer that voluntarily uses the E-Verify system
may also make such a certification on its first return each
calendar year in order to document such use.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb197-00